Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.465

Use of classified personnel to supervise in noninstructional activities.

Any school district may employ classified personnel to supervise school children in noninstructional activities, and in instructional activities while under the supervision of a certificated employee.

[ 1997 c 13 s 13; 1991 c 116 s 16.]